Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-462
Methamphetamine precursor; prohibited
acts; penalty.

Beginning
January 1, 2013, a seller that knowingly fails to submit methamphetamine precursor
information to the exchange as required by sections 28-458 to 28-462 or knowingly
submits incorrect information to the exchange shall be guilty of a Class IV
misdemeanor.

Laws 2011, LB20, § 7.